Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 39 Governmental Claims

Cross references. —

As to individual liability of members of nonprofit corporate boards or governmental agencies, see §

1-23-107

.

Claims against state require legislative consent. —

Article 1, § 8, Wyo. Const. is not self-executing; no suit can be maintained against the state until the legislature makes provision for such filing and, absent such consent, no suit or claim could be made against the state. Worthington v. State, 598 P.2d 796,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 434

(Wyo. 1979).

County cannot sue state in absence of specific constitutional or statutory provision

authorizing such an action. State v. Board of County Comm'rs, 642 P.2d 456,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 317

(Wyo. 1982).

School district may not sue state in tort. —

Regardless of immunity, a school district may not sue the state, its creator and of which it is a part, in tort. The Wyoming Governmental Claim Act has no relevancy to this matter. Carbon County Sch. Dist. v. Wyoming State Hosp., 680 P.2d 773,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1984).

Court without jurisdiction over action against governmental
entity where no prior claim filed. —

A district court has no subject matter jurisdiction over a tort action brought by a complainant against a governmental entity, where the complainant fails to allege that a claim has been filed pursuant to §

1-39-113

and where, in fact, no claim has been filed. Dee v. Laramie County, 666 P.2d 957,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 344

(Wyo. 1983), overruled in part, Brown v. City of Casper, 2011 WY 35, 248 P.3d 1136,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2011).

Action between two governmental entities involving state educational
funding. —

The Wyoming Governmental Claims Act is not applicable to an action between two governmental entities when the relief sought is a declaration of rights and liabilities of the governmental entitles under statutes affecting state educational funding and for the recovery of monies that should have been distributed in the past. Board of County Comm'rs v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 884 P.2d 946,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1994).

State penitentiary training officer. —

A training officer acting within the scope of his employment at a state penitentiary enjoys immunity from suit under this act. Vigil v. Ruettgers, 887 P.2d 521,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1994).

Stated

in

Simons v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 741 P.2d 1116,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

Rocky Mt. Oil & Gas Ass'n v. State, 645 P.2d 1163,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 345

(Wyo. 1982); City of Kemmerer v. Wagner, 866 P.2d 1283,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1993); Harston v. Campbell County Mem. Hosp., 913 P.2d 870,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Doctrine of Sovereign Immunity in Wyoming: Current Status of the Doctrine and Arguments for Abrogation,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 221 (1985).

For comments, “Wyoming Tort Reform and the Medical Malpractice Insurance Crisis: A Second Opinion,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 593 (1993).

For article, “Wyoming's New Comparative Fault Statute,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

57 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal, County, School, and State Tort Liability § 1 et seq.

Liability of state, in issuing automobile certificate of title, for failure to discover title defect, 28 ALR4th 184.

State or local governmental unit's liability for injury to private highway construction worker based on its own negligence, 29 ALR4th 1188.

Official immunity of state national guard members, 52 ALR4th 1095.

Right of insured, precluded from recovering against owner or operator of uninsured motor vehicle because of governmental immunity, to recover uninsured motorist benefits, 55 ALR4th 806.

Governmental liability for failure to post highway deer crossing warning signs, 59 ALR4th 1217.

Tort liability of college or university for injury suffered by student as a result of own or fellow student's intoxication, 62 ALR4th 81.

State and local government liability for injury or death of bicyclist due to defect or obstruction in public bicycle path, 68 ALR4th 204.

Tort liability of college, university, fraternity or sorority for injury or death of member or prospective member by hazing or initiation activity, 68 ALR4th 228.

Governmental liability for negligence in licensing, regulating or supervising private day-care home in which child is injured, 68 ALR4th 266.

Municipal liability for negligent fire inspection and subsequent enforcement, 69 ALR4th 739.

Governmental tort liability for detour accidents, 1 ALR5th 163.

Right of one governmental subdivision to sue another such subdivision for damages, 11 ALR5th 630.

Liability of school or school personnel in connection with suicide of student, 17 ALR5th 179.

Validity, construction and application of “hazing” statutes, 30 ALR5th 683.

Complaint as satisfying requirement of notice of claim upon states, municipalities, and other political subdivisions, 45 ALR5th 109.

Persons or entities upon whom notice of injury or claim against state or state agencies may or must be served, 45 ALR5th 173.

Reviewability before trial of order denying qualified immunity to defendant sued in state court under 42 USCS § 1983, 49 ALR5th 717.

State or local government's liability to subcontractors, laborers, or materialmen for failure to require general contractor to post bond, 54 ALR5th 649.

Liability of United States for failure to warn of danger or hazard
resulting from governmental act or omission as affected by “discretionary
function or duty” exception to federal Tort Claims Act (28 USC § 2680(a)),
65 ALR Fed 358.

Applicability of Jones Act (46 USC § 688) to foreign seamen, foreign ships, or other foreign circumstances,
68 ALR Fed 360.

Right of member of family of serviceman to maintain action under
Federal Tort Claims Act (28 USC §§ 1346(b) , 2671 -2680) against United States based upon injuries sustained
by serviceman while on active duty,
69 ALR Fed 949.

Applicability of libel and slander exception to waiver of sovereign
immunity under Federal Torts Claims Act (28 USC § 2680(h)),
79 ALR Fed 826.

Applicability of 28 USC §§ 2680(a) and 2680(h) to Federal Tort Claims Act liability arising out of government informant's conduct, 85 ALR Fed 848.

Calculation of attorneys' fees under Federal Tort Claims Act — 28 USC § 2678, 86 ALR Fed 866.

Construction and application of Federal Tort Claims Act provision
excepting from coverage claims arising out of assault and battery
(28 USC § 2680(h)),
88 ALR Fed 7.

Construction and application of Federal Tort Claims Act provision
excepting from coverage claims arising out of interference with contract
rights (28 USC § 2680(h)),
92 ALR Fed 186.

Liability of local government under § 107(a) of Comprehensive Environmental
Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA) (42 USC § 9607(a)),
133 ALR Fed 293.

Validity, as against claim under 42 USC § 1983, of accused's release-dismissal agreement, under which release of civil claims, against public officials or entities, growing out of criminal charges, is given to obtain relief from those charges — Post-Newton Cases, 139 ALR Fed 1.

Application of statute of limitations (42 USC § 9613(g)(2)) in action under § 107 of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA) for recovery of costs for removal and or remedial action, 142 ALR Fed 115.

Construction and application of statute of limitations (42 USC § 9613(g)(1)) for action under § 107 of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA) (42 USC § 9607) for natural resource damages, 144 ALR Fed 285.

What constitutes “facility” within meaning of § 101(9) of the Comprehensive, Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (CERCLA) (42 U.S.C. § 9601(9)), 147 ALR Fed 469.

What constitutes “claim arising in a foreign country” under 28 U.S.C. § 2680(k), excluding such claims from Federal Tort Claims Act, 158 ALR Fed 137.

63 C.J.S. Municipal Corporations §§ 661 to 672; 81A C.J.S. States §§ 196 to 202, 267 to 296, 298 to 306.

§ 1-39-101.
Short title.

This act shall be known
and cited as the “Wyoming Governmental Claims Act”.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 1-39-103(a)(viii).

No equal protection violation. —

Where a new prison policy prohibited prisoners from keeping certain personal property items in their cells, an inmate sued the Wyoming Department of Corrections (DOC) and claimed he had been denied equal protection of the law because the legislature did not include the DOC and the Wyoming State Penitentiary within the waiver of the rule of immunity. The Supreme Court of Wyoming rejected his claim, because the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act does not differentiate between inmates and non-inmates; since the inmate sought tens of millions of dollars in compensation for more than a thousand separate pieces of property, excluding such losses from the beneficent purposes of the WGCA was rational and withstood the equal protection provisions of both the United States and the Wyoming constitutions.
Cosco v. Lampert, 2010 WY 52, 229 P.3d 962,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2010), cert. denied, 563 U.S. 910, 131 S. Ct. 1798, 179 L. Ed. 2d 666, 2011 U.S. LEXIS 2478 (U.S. 2011).

Qualified Immunity. —

Sheriff, the county, and the board of county commissioners were entitled to summary judgment in a case filed under this section by an inmate who was sexually assault by a detention officer. The sheriff's supervision of an employee was a discretionary act and he acted in good faith when he opted not to terminate the detention officer for a prior disciplinary incident in which he admitting to taking inmate drugs; the record contained nothing to alert the sheriff of the risk that the officer would sexually assault an inmate.
Uinta County v. Pennington, 286 P.3d 138, 2012 WY 129,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Oct 1, 2012).

Chapter may be construed as further, but incomplete, waiver of sovereign immunity.

Oyler v. State, 618 P.2d 1042,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 316

(Wyo. 1980).

State loan and investment board immune from suit. —

The Wyoming Farm Loan Board (now state loan and investment board) is a governmental entity for purposes of the immunity under §

1-39-104

.Haldeman v. Wyoming Farm Loan Bd., 32 F.3d 469,

1994 U.S. App. LEXIS 21130

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1994).

Constitutional signature and certification requirements are
jurisdictional. —

Claim filed under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-101

et seq., must meet the requirements of art. 16, § 7, Wyo. Const., including the requirement that it be signed by the claimant and certified to under penalty of perjury. Martinez v. City of Cheyenne, 791 P.2d 949,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1990), overruled, Beaulieu v. Florquist, 2004 WY 31, 86 P.3d 863,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 2004).

Notice of claim. —

Wyoming law is clear that presentation of a notice of claim is required in order to bring an action against a governmental entity and the failure to comply with that condition precedent results in dismissal. There is no requirement under Wyoming law that presentation of the notice of claim has to be alleged in the complaint; likewise, district courts do not lack jurisdiction over an action against a governmental entity if presentation of a claim is not alleged.
Brown v. City of Casper, 2011 WY 35, 248 P.3d 1136,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2011).

Applied

in

Allen v. Lucero, 925 P.2d 228,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Boehm v. Cody Country Chamber of Commerce, 748 P.2d 704,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 569

(Wyo. 1987); Compass Ins. Co. v. Cravens, Dargan & Co., 748 P.2d 724,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1988); Katona v. City of Cheyenne, 686 F. Supp. 287, 1988 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 4215 (D. Wyo. 1988); Stalkup v. State Dep't of Envtl. Quality, 838 P.2d 705,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1992); Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. Catchpole,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 147

, 6 P.3d 1275 (Wyo. 2000); Board of County Comm'rs v. Bassett, 8 P.3d 1079,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 2000); Eathorne v. Bd. of Trustees, 2001 WY 36,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 47

, 21 P.3d 745 (Wyo. 2001)City of Torrington v. Cottier, 2006 WY 145, 145 P.3d 1274,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(2006); Gose v. City of Douglas, 2008 WY 126, 193 P.3d 1159,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Oct. 13, 2008); McCann v. City of Cody, 2009 WY 86, 210 P.3d 1078,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(July 6, 2009); Heimer v. Antelope Valley Improvement, 2010 WY 29, 226 P.3d 860,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Mar. 18, 2010); Campbell County Mem. Hosp. v. Pfeifle, 2014 WY 3, 317 P.3d 573,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 3

, 2014 WL 46689 (Jan 7, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of United States, under Federal Tort Claims Act (28 U.S.C. § 1346(b) , 2671 et seq.) or Suits in Admiralty Act (46 App. U.S.C. § 741
et seq.), for injuries or damages arising from issuance, preparation,
or distribution of charts, maps, or like navigational aids,
164 ALR Fed 541.

§ 1-39-102.
Purpose.

The Wyoming legislature recognizes the inherently unfair and inequitable results which occur in the strict application of the doctrine of governmental immunity and is cognizant of the Wyoming Supreme Court decision of Oroz v. Board of County Commissioners 575 P.2d 1155 (1978). It is further recognized that the state and its political subdivisions as trustees of public revenues are constituted to serve the inhabitants of the state of Wyoming and furnish certain services not available through private parties and, in the case of the state, state revenues may only be expended upon legislative appropriation. This act is adopted by the legislature to balance the respective equities between persons injured by governmental actions and the taxpayers of the state of Wyoming whose revenues are utilized by governmental entities on behalf of those taxpayers. This act is intended to retain any common law defenses which a defendant may have by virtue of decisions from this or other jurisdictions.

In the case of the state, this act abolishes all judicially created categories such as “governmental” or “proprietary” functions and “discretionary” or “ministerial” acts previously used by the courts to determine immunity or liability. This act does not impose nor allow the imposition of strict liability for acts of governmental entities or public employees.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 1-39-103(a)(viii).

Inmate's equal protections rights were not violated. —

Where a new prison policy prohibited prisoners from keeping certain personal property items in their cells, an inmate sued the Wyoming Department of Corrections (DOC) and claimed he had been denied equal protection of the law because the legislature did not include the DOC and the Wyoming State Penitentiary within the waiver of the rule of immunity; the Supreme Court of Wyoming rejected his claim, because the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act (WGCA) does not differentiate between inmates and non-inmates. The inmate's claim was subject to rational scrutiny; since the inmate sought tens of millions of dollars in compensation for more than a thousand separate pieces of property, excluding such losses from the beneficent purposes of the WGCA was rational and withstood the equal protection provisions of both the United States and the Wyoming constitutions.
Cosco v. Lampert, 2010 WY 52, 229 P.3d 962,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 2010), cert. denied, 563 U.S. 910, 131 S. Ct. 1798, 179 L. Ed. 2d 666, 2011 U.S. LEXIS 2478 (U.S. 2011).

Discussion of history of common-law governmental immunity.
—

See State v. Stovall, 648 P.2d 543,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1982).

Exceptions to immunity.—

Supreme court rejected parents’ request to recognize an exception to immunity for violation of school policy and/or criminal conduct because it was not the supreme court’s prerogative to expand the exceptions to immunity beyond that provided by the legislature in the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act. Whitham v. Feller, 2018 WY 43, 415 P.3d 1264,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2018).

No governmental act. —

There was not a scintilla of evidence in the record indicating that a governmental entity or an employee of the state was in any way responsible for the oil spill caused by unknown third persons. Compass Ins. Co. v. Cravens, Dargan & Co., 748 P.2d 724,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1988).

Under the lost chance doctrine, a negligent act must be a substantial cause of the lost chance to survive, and the damages awarded must be fully apportioned; therefore, medical malpractice claims using the doctrine are within the protection afforded by this section. McMackin v. Johnson County Healthcare Ctr., 2004 WY 44, 88 P.3d 491,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2004).

Action between two governmental entities involving state educational
funding. —

The Wyoming Governmental Claims Act is not applicable to an action between two governmental entities when the relief sought is a declaration of rights and liabilities of the governmental entitles under statutes affecting state educational funding and for the recovery of monies that should have been distributed in the past. Board of County Comm'rs v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 884 P.2d 946,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1994).

No respondeat superior actions. —

A governmental entity cannot be held liable under 42 USCS § 1983 on a respondeat superior theory. Kimbley v. Green River, 663 P.2d 871,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 317

(Wyo. 1983).

No liability for harboring vicious animal. —

The waiver of governmental immunity incorporated in §

1-39-104

does not permit a claim of common-law liability for harboring an animal known to be vicious to be asserted against a city or town. Such a claim sounds in strict liability and claims for strict liability are not included in the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act. Abelseth v. City of Gillette, 752 P.2d 430,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1988).

Sheriff's liability. —

Neither the sheriff nor the county was liable for the tortious conduct of the deputy because that conduct did not occur within the deputy's scope of duties, and neither the sheriff nor the county was liable for the conduct of the sheriff, even though within the scope of his duties, because his conduct was not tortious.
Boyer-Gladden v. Hill, 2010 WY 12, 224 P.3d 21,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2010).

Review of summary judgment. —

Because immunity under the Wyoming Government Claims Act is an immunity from suit and not merely a defense to liability, it, like qualified immunity, is effectively lost if the case is erroneously permitted to go to trial; therefore, a denial of summary judgment based on a claim of governmental immunity is appealable without the need for a writ of review. Wyo. State Hosp. v. Romine, 2021 WY 47, 483 P.3d 840,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2021).

Interlocutory review of denials of summary judgment based on governmental immunity is limited to the purely legal issue of whether the State is immune from suit under the Government Claims Act; the supreme court may review whether the legislature waived the State’s sovereign immunity under the Act, i.e., whether the plaintiff’s claims fall within a statutory exceptions to sovereign immunity, but denials of summary judgment based on issues pertaining to the State’s liability are not appealable. Wyo. State Hosp. v. Romine, 2021 WY 47, 483 P.3d 840,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2021).

Quoted

in

Hamlin v. Transcon Lines, 697 P.2d 606,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 466

(Wyo. 1985); Hamlin v. Transcon Lines, 701 P.2d 1139,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1985); De Wald v. State, 719 P.2d 643,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 561

(Wyo. 1986); Morgan v. City of Rawlins, 792 F.2d 975,

1986 U.S. App. LEXIS 25532

(10th Cir. 1986); Harbel v. Wintermute, 883 P.2d 359,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1994); Natrona County v. Blake, 2003 WY 170, 81 P.3d 948,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 2003); Campbell County Mem. Hosp. v. Pfeifle, 2014 WY 3, 317 P.3d 573,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 3

, 2014 WL 46689 (Jan 7, 2014).

Stated

in

Weston County Hosp. Joint Powers Bd. v. Westates Constr. Co., 841 P.2d 841,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1992); Vigil v. Ruettgers, 887 P.2d 521,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1994).

Cited

in

Keehn ex rel. Keehn v. Town of Torrington, 834 P.2d 112,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 1992); Heimer v. Antelope Valley Improvement, 2010 WY 29, 226 P.3d 860,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Mar. 18, 2010); Harmon v. Star Valley Med. Ctr., 2014 WY 90,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Jul 16, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

For comment, “Landowner Liability Under the Wyoming Recreational Use Statute,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 649 (1980).

For comment, “The Doctrine of Sovereign Immunity in Wyoming: Current Status of the Doctrine and Arguments for Abrogation,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 221 (1985).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Immunity of public officer from liability for injuries caused by negligently released individual, 5 ALR4th 773.

Modern status of rule excusing governmental unit from tort liability on theory that only general, not particular, duty was owed under circumstances, 38 ALR4th 1194.

§ 1-39-103.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Governmental entity” means the state, University of Wyoming or any local government;

“Local government” means cities and towns, counties, school districts, joint powers boards, airport boards, public corporations, community college districts, special districts and their governing bodies, all political subdivisions of the state, and their agencies, instrumentalities and institutions, and governmental entities of another state but only while physically present in the state of Wyoming and while in the course of operating a cooperative public transportation program as defined by W.S. 16-1-104(f);

“Peace officer” means as defined by W.S.

7-2-101

, but does not include those officers defined by W.S.

7-2-101

(a)(iv)(K) or those officers defined by W.S. 7-2-101(a)(iv)(M) unless otherwise provided in the applicable mutual aid agreement;

“Public employee”:

Means any officer, employee or servant of a governmental entity, including elected or appointed officials, peace officers and persons acting on behalf or in service of a governmental entity in any official capacity, whether with or without compensation;

Does not include an independent contractor, except as provided in subparagraphs (C) and (F) of this paragraph, or a judicial officer exercising the authority vested in him;

Includes contract physicians, physician assistants, nurses, optometrists and dentists in the course of providing contract services for state institutions or county jails;

Includes individuals engaged in search and rescue operations under the coordination of a county sheriff pursuant to W.S. 18-3-609(a)(iii);

Includes any volunteer physician providing medical services under W.S. 9-2-103(a)(i)(C);

Includes contract attorneys in the course of providing contract services for the office of guardian ad litem as provided in W.S.

14-12-104

;

Includes any health care provider, as defined by W.S.

35-31-101

(a)(iii), and any individual included in the definition of medical facility in W.S.

35-31-101

(a)(v), under a contract with the state to deliver volunteer health care services to low income persons under W.S. 35-31-101 through

35-31-103

while providing the contracted services. Nothing in this subparagraph alters the requirement that any action for damages shall be brought against the state of Wyoming as provided by W.S. 35-31-102(g).

“Scope of duties” means performing any duties which a governmental entity requests, requires or authorizes a public employee to perform regardless of the time and place of performance;

“State” or “state agency” means the state of Wyoming or any of its branches, agencies, departments, boards, instrumentalities or institutions;

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 41, § 2.

“Governmental entity of another state” means any state and its political subdivisions, agencies, instrumentalities and institutions and any local government entity within another state;

“This act” means W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-120

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 1; 1981, ch. 15, § 1; 1986, ch. 74, § 2; ch. 89, § 2; 1989, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 65, § 1; 1997, ch. 159, § 1; 1999, ch. 157, § 2; 2000, ch. 61, § 1; 2003, ch. 53, § 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2007, ch. 212, § 1; ch. 215, § 1; 2012, ch. 76, § 3; 2017 ch. 41, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 113, § 1, effective March 2, 2017; 2017 ch. 153, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 95, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2020 ch. 122, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2006 amendment

made a stylistic change at the end of (a)(v).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 212, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(iv)(C), inserted “physician assistants, nurses, optometrists and dentists,” and inserted “or county jails” at the end of the sentence.

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 215, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, substituted “9-2-103(a)(i))(C)” for “9-2-103(a)(iii)” in (a)(iv)(E).

While neither amendment gave affect to the other, both have been set out above.

The 2012 amendment,

in (a)(iv)(B), substituted “subparagraphs” for “subparagraph” and inserted “and (F)”; and added (a)(iv)(F).

Laws 2012, ch. 76 § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2012.

The 2017 amendments. —

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, by ch. 41 § 1, effective July 1, 2017, at the end of former (a)(viii), present (a)(ix), substituted “1-39-120” for “1-39-121.”

The second 2017 amendment, by ch. 41, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, deleted former (a)(vii), which read: ““Year 2000 date change” means the change from calendar year 1999 AD to 2000 AD and associated date computations including the proper recognition of the year 2000 as a leap year.”

The third 2017 amendment, by ch. 113, § 1, in (a)(iv)(D), deleted “and the provisions of
W.S.

1-39-112

shall apply for purposes of damages resulting from bodily injury, wrongful death or property damage caused by their negligence while acting within the scope of their duties”; and made a related change. Laws 2017, ch. 113, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art. 4, § 8, Wy. Const. Approved Mar. 2, 2017.

The fourth 2017 amendment, by ch. 153, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, at the end of (a)(ii), inserted “, and governmental entities of another state but only while physically present in the state of Wyoming and while in the course of operating a cooperative public transportation program as defined by W.S. 16-1-104(f)”; added present (a)(viii), and redesignated former (a)(viii) as (a)(ix).

While none of the amendments gave effect to the others, all have been set out as reconciled by the legislative service office.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018,
added (a)(iv)(G).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(iv)(F) substituted “office of guardian ad litem” for “state public defenders office” and “W.S.

14-12-104

” for “W.S. 7-6-103(k) or

14-12-104

.”

Cross references. —

As to University of Wyoming, see §

21-17-201

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Applicability. —

Laws 2007, ch. 212, § 3, states: “This act shall apply to acts or omissions occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

Applicability. —

Because parents and a student specifically alleged that school district employees acted within their scope of duties, the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act applied to the employees’ actions as alleged in the complaint; the complaint stated the acts were attributed to the school district, and generally alleged the employees were acting within the scope of their employment or agency; Whitham v. Feller, 2018 WY 43, 415 P.3d 1264,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2018).

Employee of independent contractor. —

District court improperly denied a government hospital's motion for partial summary judgment in a medical malpractice action arising from the actions of a nurse employed by a contracted anesthesia services provider because the nurse was not a “public employee” for purposes of the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, and the Act did not provide an express waiver of sovereign immunity for non-employees of a governmental hospital; the district court erred in reading a prior appellate decision as implicitly waiving sovereign immunity against governmental entities for acts of ostensible or apparent agents. Campbell County Mem. Hosp. v. Pfeifle, 2014 WY 3, 317 P.3d 573,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2014).

“Governmental entity” and “political subdivision” not equivalent
concepts. —

The terms “governmental entity” and “political subdivision” are not equivalent concepts; using the broad definition of a governmental entity, any political subdivision is a governmental entity but the inverse is not true and a governmental entity does not necessarily constitute a political subdivision. Weston County Hosp. Joint Powers Bd. v. Westates Constr. Co., 841 P.2d 841,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1992).

Board of cooperative educational services is “governmental entity”

for the purposes of this chapter, and the board's employees are not school district employees whose liability could be imputed to the district. Sykes v. Lincoln County Sch. Dist. No. 1 & 2, Sykes v. Lincoln County Sch. Dist., 763 P.2d 1263,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1988).

Board of county commissioners is “governmental entity” for purposes of this chapter,

such that sovereign immunity barred recovery in former coroner's tortious action for conduct not specifically enumerated under this chapter, conduct which involved budgetary allocations and expense determinations within the scope of the commissioners' duties. Veile v. Board of County Comm'rs, 860 P.2d 1174,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1993).

Department is governmental unit. —

The Wyoming department of transportation is the same governmental unit as its sister agencies, the department of employment and workers' safety and compensation division, for the purposes of applying the Bankruptcy Code's claim-specific immunity waiver provision. Wyoming DOT v. Straight (In re Straight), 143 F.3d 1387, 1998 U.S. App. LEXIS 12124 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 525 U.S. 982, 119 S. Ct. 446, 142 L. Ed. 2d 400, 1998 U.S. LEXIS 7131 (U.S. 1998).

Construction with other law. —

Because workers' compensation statute did not define “state employee,” court elected to use ordinary and obvious definition of “public employee” found in Wyoming Governmental Claims Act. Sell v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div. (In re Sell), 7 P.3d 1,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 2000).

County pest control board deemed “special district.” —

A county weed and pest control board is included in this section as a “special district [or its] governing body.” Cranston v. Weston County Weed & Pest Bd., 826 P.2d 251,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1992).

Residential treatment facility not a public employee. —

Nonprofit corporation certified by the state as a residential treatment facility was not a public employee for the purpose of establishing liability under the Governmental Claims Act, §

1-39-101

et seq., for the deaths of two minors in its care. Cline v. Department of Family Servs., 927 P.2d 261,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 1996).

Liability of off-duty police officer. —

In wrongful death action, if the trier of fact determined that off-duty police officer was not acting within the scope of his official duties, then the municipality and the police officer would be insulated from liability under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act. If, however, the trier of fact determined that the officer was acting within the scope of his official duties and was authorized to act at the accident scene, and that he, therefore, owed a legal duty to the deceased, liability should be determined as it would be in any negligence case. Duncan v. Town of Jackson, 903 P.2d 548,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 1995).

Applied

in

Milton v. Mitchell, 762 P.2d 372,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1988).

Quoted

in

Kimbley v. City of Green River, 663 P.2d 871,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 317

(Wyo. 1983).

Stated

in

Davis v. City of Casper, 710 P.2d 827,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 612

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

State v. Stovall, 648 P.2d 543,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1982); Vigil v. Ruettgers, 887 P.2d 521,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1994); Peterson v. Sweetwater County Sch. Dist. No. One, 929 P.2d 525,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1996); Boyer-Gladden v. Hill, 2010 WY 12, 224 P.3d 21,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Feb. 9, 2010); Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. One v. Cheyenne Newspapers, 2011 WY 55, 250 P.3d 522,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Mar. 29, 2011).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

For comment, “The Doctrine of Sovereign Immunity in Wyoming: Current Status of the Doctrine and Arguments for Abrogation,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 221 (1985).

For article, “Who's Really Who? Apportioning Liability of Independent Contractors Who Work for Hospitals that Qualify for Sovereign Immunity in a Rural State”, see 15 Wyo. L. Rev. 211 (2015).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Immunity of public officer from liability for injuries caused by negligently released individual, 5 ALR4th 773.

What claims of governmental units constitute taxes qualifying for
priority under provisions of §
507(a)(8) of Bankruptcy Code (11 U.S.C. § 507(a)(8)),
148 ALR Fed 351.

When is federal agency employee independent contractor, creating exception to United States waiver of immunity under Federal Tort Claims Act (28 U.S.C. § 2671), 166 ALR Fed 187.